Hawaii statutes.
§121-7 Adjutant general; appointment.
The adjutant general shall be the executive head of the department of defense
and commanding general of the militia of the State. The adjutant general shall
be appointed and be subject to removal as set forth in section 26-31. The
adjutant general shall serve for the term as set forth in section 6, article V,
of the Constitution. No person shall be eligible for appointment as adjutant
general unless the person holds or has held a commission of at least a field grade
officer, federally recognized as such, or its equivalent in the national guard,
state defense force, or other branch of the armed forces of this or any other
state or territory of the United States, or in the armed forces of the United
States or a reserve component thereof and has served as a commissioned officer
in one or more of the armed services for at least ten years. [L 1967, c 196, pt
of §1; HRS §121-7; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 28, §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Cross References

General authority and organization, see §26-21.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next